Illinois, session 104th, HB4366.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Billionaire Hedge Fund Fee Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Base amount" means:8        (1) in the case of a security, the fair market value of 9    the security determined as of the time of the covered 10    transaction; and11        (2) in the case of any payment with respect to a 12    derivative, the amount of the payment.13    "Controlled foreign corporation" has the meaning given to 14that term in Section 957 of the federal Internal Revenue Code 15of 1986.16    "Covered transaction" means:17        (1) the purchase by a United States person of a 18    security if the purchase occurs on, or is subject to the 19    rules of, a qualified board or exchange; or20        (2) the purchase by a United States person of a 21    derivative if the derivative is traded on, or is subject 22    to the rules of, a qualified board or exchange.23    "Department" means the Department of Revenue.  HB4366- 2 -LRB104 15704 HLH 29838 b1    "Derivative" means any contract (including any option, 2forward contract, futures contract, short position, swap, or 3similar contract) the value of which, or any payment or other 4transfer with respect to which, is (directly or indirectly) 5determined by reference to one or more of the following:6        (1) any share of stock in a corporation;7        (2) any partnership or beneficial ownership interest 8    in a partnership or trust;9        (3) except as provided in Section 15, any evidence of 10    indebtedness;11        (4) any real property;12        (5) any commodity that is actively traded;13        (6) any currency;14        (7) any rate, price, amount, index, formula, or 15    algorithm; or16        (8) any other item designated by the Department.17    "Hedge fund" has the meaning given in 12 U.S.C. 181851(h)(2).19    "Private equity fund" has the meaning given in 12 U.S.C. 201851(h)(2).21    "Qualified board or exchange" means the Chicago Board 22Options Exchange or the Chicago Mercantile Exchange.23    "Security" means:24        (1) any share of stock in a corporation;25        (2) any partnership or beneficial ownership interest 26    in a partnership or trust; or  HB4366- 3 -LRB104 15704 HLH 29838 b1        (3) except as provided in Section 15, any note, bond, 2    debenture, or other evidence of indebtedness.3    "United States person" has the meaning given to that term 4in Section 7701 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 5"United States person" also includes controlled foreign 6corporations, hedge funds, and private equity funds and their 7officers and employees. 8    Section 10. Fee imposed; amount of fee. There is hereby 9imposed a fee on each covered transaction occurring on or 10after July 1, 2026. The amount of the fee shall be the base 11amount with respect to the covered transaction, multiplied by 120.002. 13    Section 15. Exceptions. No fee shall be imposed under this 14Act:15        (1) on any covered transaction involving the initial 16    public offering of any security; or17        (2) on any covered transaction involving a note, bond, 18    debenture, or other evidence of indebtedness that has a 19    fixed maturity of not more than 100 days.20    No fee is imposed under this Act upon the privilege of 21engaging in a business in interstate commerce or otherwise 22when the business may not, under the Constitution and statutes 23of the United States, be made the subject of taxation by this 24State.   HB4366- 4 -LRB104 15704 HLH 29838 b1    Section 25. Collection by qualified board or exchange. The 2fee imposed by this Act shall be collected by the qualified 3board or exchange from the purchaser and shall be remitted to 4the Department monthly in the form and manner required by the 5Department. 6    Section 30. Fee administered by the Department of Revenue; 7deposit into the Reducing the Cost of Living Fund. 8    (a) The fee imposed under this Act, and all civil 9penalties that may be assessed as an incident thereof, shall 10be administered, collected, and enforced by the Department. 11The Department has full power to administer and enforce this 12Act, to collect all fees and penalties due under this Act, to 13dispose of fees and penalties so collected as provided in this 14Act, and to determine all rights to credit memoranda arising 15on account of the erroneous payment of a fee or penalty under 16this Act.17    (b) The Department of Revenue shall pay over to the State 18Treasurer all moneys remitted to the Department under this Act 19for deposit into the Reducing the Cost of Living Fund, a 20special fund created in the State treasury. Subject to 21appropriation, moneys in the Reducing the Cost of Living Fund 22shall be used as follows:23        (1) $5,000,000,000 shall be used in each State fiscal 24    year by the State Board of Education to make grants to   HB4366- 5 -LRB104 15704 HLH 29838 b1    school districts in exchange for a corresponding reduction 2    in the school districts' property tax levies;3        (2) $800,000,000 shall be used in each State fiscal 4    year by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 5    to provide reimbursement to healthcare providers for 6    Medicaid services and for Medicaid premium reductions; and7        (3) in each State fiscal year, the State Comptroller 8    shall order transferred and the State Treasurer shall 9    transfer from the Reducing the Cost of Living Fund to the 10    Road Fund the amount of $1,000,000,000;11        (4) $1,000,000,000 shall be used in each State fiscal 12    year by the Department of Transportation to make grants to 13    mass transit districts; and14        (5) the remainder shall be used in each State fiscal 15    year to provide stimulus payments, in accordance with 16    rules adopted by the Department of Commerce and Economic 17    Opportunity, to Illinois residents who (i) have dependent 18    children under the age of 18 during the taxable year or 19    (ii) own a single family homes or a residential dwelling 20    with 6 units or less. 21    Section 35. Recordkeeping. Each qualified board or 22exchange shall keep records and books of all transactions 23giving rise to a fee under this Act. Those books and records 24shall be kept in the English language and shall, at all times 25during business hours of the day, be subject to inspection by   HB4366- 6 -LRB104 15704 HLH 29838 b1the Department or its duly authorized agents and employees. 2    Section 40. Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and Uniform 3Penalty and Interest Act adopted. The provisions of Sections 44, 5, 5f, 5i, 6, 6a, 6b, 6c, 8, 9, 10, and 12 of the Retailers' 5Occupation Tax Act which are not inconsistent with this Act, 6and Section 3-7 of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act, shall 7apply as far as practicable to the subject matter of this Act 8to the same extent as if those provisions were included in this 9Act. 10    Section 42. Exemption. Notwithstanding any other provision 11of this Act, this Act does not apply to the purchase of a 12security or a derivative by an individual exclusively for that 13individual's personal investment account or personal 14investment portfolio. 15    Section 45. Rules. The Department shall adopt 16administrative rules to implement and administer this Act. 17Initial rules may be adopted as emergency rules. 18    Section 900. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 19amended by adding Section 5-45.71 as follows: 20    (5 ILCS 100/5-45.71 new)21    Sec. 5-45.71. Emergency rulemaking; Billionaire Hedge Fund   HB4366- 7 -LRB104 15704 HLH 29838 b1Fee Act. To provide for the expeditious and timely 2implementation of the Billionaire Hedge Fund Fee Act, 3emergency rules implementing the Billionaire Hedge Fund Fee 4Act may be adopted in accordance with Section 5-45 by the 5Department of Revenue. The adoption of emergency rules 6authorized by Section 5-45 and this Section is deemed to be 7necessary for the public interest, safety, and welfare.8    This Section is repealed one year after the effective date 9of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 10    Section 905. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 11Section 5.1038 as follows: 12    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)13    Sec. 5.1038. The Reducing the Cost of Living Fund. 14    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.